Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.042

Actuarially reduced retirement allowance—Spousal benefit.

(1) Any retired firefighter married to a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 may choose an actuarially equivalent benefit adopted by the board that pays the retired firefighter a reduced retirement allowance, and upon death such portion of the retired firefighter's reduced retirement allowance as designated by the retired firefighter shall be continued throughout the life of the spouse.

(2) A retired firefighter who married a spouse ineligible for survivor benefits under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 prior to July 26, 2009, has one year after July 26, 2009, to designate their spouse as a survivor beneficiary.

(3) The benefit provided to a child survivor beneficiary under RCW 41.18.040, 41.18.080, and 41.18.100 shall not be affected or reduced by the retired firefighter's selection of the actuarially reduced spousal survivor benefit provided by this section, and shall be equivalent to the amount payable as if the choice under subsection (1) of this section was not made.

(4)(a) Any retired firefighter who chose to receive a reduced retirement allowance under subsection (1) of this section is entitled to receive a retirement allowance adjusted in accordance with (b) of this subsection if:

(i) The retiree's survivor spouse designated in subsection (1) of this section predeceases the retiree; and

(ii) The retiree provides to the board proper proof of the designated beneficiary's death.

(b) The retirement allowance payable to the retiree from the beginning of the month following the date of the beneficiary's death shall be the current monthly amount payable as if the selection under subsection (1) of this section was not made.

[ 2009 c 156 s 1.]